Missouri, session 2026, SB956.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 287.120, 287.240, and 537.610, RSMo,
are repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 287.120, 287.240, and 537.610, to read as
follows:
287.120. 1. Every employer subject to the provisions
of this chapter shall be liable, irrespective of negligence,
to furnish compensation under the provisions of this chapter
for personal injury or death of the employee by accident or
occupational disease arising out of and in the course of the
employee's employment. Any employee of such employer shall
not be liable for any injury or death for which compensation
is recoverable under this chapter and every employer and
employees of such employer shall be released from all other
liability whatsoever, whether to the employee or any other
person, except that an employee shall not be released from
liability for injury or death if the employee engaged in an
affirmative negligent act that purposefully and dangerously
caused or increased the risk of injury. The term "accident"
as used in this section shall include, but not be limited
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 956 2
to, injury or death of the employee caused by the unprovoked
violence or assault against the employee by any person.
2. The rights and remedies herein granted to an
employee shall exclude all other rights and remedies of the
employee, the employee's spouse, parents, personal
representatives, dependents, heirs or next kin, at common
law or otherwise, on account of such injury or death by
accident or occupational disease, except such rights and
remedies as are not provided for by this chapter.
3. No compensation shall be allowed under this chapter
for the injury or death due to the employee's intentional
self-inflicted injury, but the burden of proof of
intentional self-inflicted injury shall be on the employer
or the person contesting the claim for allowance.
4. Where the injury or death is caused by the failure
of the employer to comply with any safety standard issued by
the employer or the occupational safety and health
administration, regulation, or statute in this state or any
lawful order of the division or the commission, the
compensation and death benefit provided for under this
chapter shall be increased [fifteen] at least twenty-five
but not more than fifty percent.
5. Where the injury is caused by the failure of the
employee to use safety devices where provided by the
employer, or from the employee's failure to obey any
reasonable rule adopted by the employer for the safety of
employees, the compensation and death benefit provided for
herein shall be reduced at least twenty-five but not more
than fifty percent; provided, that it is shown that the
employee had actual knowledge of the rule so adopted by the
employer; and provided, further, that the employer had,
prior to the injury, made a reasonable effort to cause his

SB 956 3
or her employees to use the safety device or devices and to
obey or follow the rule so adopted for the safety of the
employees.
6. (1) Where the employee fails to obey any rule or
policy adopted by the employer relating to a drug-free
workplace or the use of alcohol or nonprescribed controlled
drugs in the workplace, the compensation and death benefit
provided for herein shall be reduced fifty percent if the
injury was sustained in conjunction with the use of alcohol
or nonprescribed controlled drugs.
(2) If, however, the use of alcohol or nonprescribed
controlled drugs in violation of the employer's rule or
policy is the proximate cause of the injury, then the
benefits or compensation otherwise payable under this
chapter for death or disability shall be forfeited.
(3) The voluntary use of alcohol to the percentage of
blood alcohol sufficient under Missouri law to constitute
legal intoxication shall give rise to a rebuttable
presumption that the voluntary use of alcohol under such
circumstances was the proximate cause of the injury. A
preponderance of the evidence standard shall apply to rebut
such presumption. An employee's refusal to take a test for
alcohol or a nonprescribed controlled substance, as defined
by section 195.010, at the request of the employer shall
result in the forfeiture of benefits under this chapter if
the employer had sufficient cause to suspect use of alcohol
or a nonprescribed controlled substance by the claimant or
if the employer's policy clearly authorizes post-injury
testing.
(4) Any positive test result for a nonprescribed
controlled drug or the metabolites of such drug from an
employee shall give rise to a rebuttable presumption, which

SB 956 4
may be rebutted by a preponderance of evidence, that the
tested nonprescribed controlled drug was in the employee's
system at the time of the accident or injury and that the
injury was sustained in conjunction with the use of the
tested nonprescribed controlled drug if:
(a) The initial testing was administered within twenty-
four hours of the accident or injury;
(b) Notice was given to the employee of the test
results within fourteen calendar days of the insurer or
group self-insurer receiving actual notice of the
confirmatory test results;
(c) The employee was given an opportunity to perform a
second test upon the original sample; and
(d) The initial or any subsequent testing that forms
the basis of the presumption was confirmed by mass
spectrometry using generally accepted medical or forensic
testing procedures.
7. Where the employee's participation in a
recreational activity or program is the prevailing cause of
the injury, benefits or compensation otherwise payable under
100 this chapter for death or disability shall be forfeited
101 regardless that the employer may have promoted, sponsored or
102 supported the recreational activity or program, expressly or
103 impliedly, in whole or in part. The forfeiture of benefits
104 or compensation shall not apply when:
105 (1) The employee was directly ordered by the employer
106 to participate in such recreational activity or program;
107 (2) The employee was paid wages or travel expenses
108 while participating in such recreational activity or
109 program; or
110 (3) The injury from such recreational activity or
111 program occurs on the employer's premises due to an unsafe

SB 956 5
112 condition and the employer had actual knowledge of the
113 employee's participation in the recreational activity or
114 program and of the unsafe condition of the premises and
115 failed to either curtail the recreational activity or
116 program or cure the unsafe condition.
117 8. Mental injury resulting from work-related stress
118 does not arise out of and in the course of the employment,
119 unless it is demonstrated that the stress is work related
120 and was extraordinary and unusual. The amount of work
121 stress shall be measured by objective standards and actual
122 events.
123 9. A mental injury is not considered to arise out of
124 and in the course of the employment if it resulted from any
125 disciplinary action, work evaluation, job transfer, layoff,
126 demotion, termination or any similar action taken in good
127 faith by the employer.
128 10. The ability of a firefighter to receive benefits
129 for psychological stress under section 287.067 shall not be
130 diminished by the provisions of subsections 8 and 9 of this
131 section.
132 11. The provisions of subsection 2 of this section
133 shall not apply to any cause of action that may be brought
134 on behalf of an unborn child or their representative in the
135 case of an injury or death which caused the death of an
136 unborn child.
287.240. If the injury causes death, either with or
without disability, the compensation therefor shall be as
provided in this section:
(1) In all cases the employer shall pay direct to the
persons furnishing the same the reasonable expense of the
burial of the deceased employee not exceeding [five] fifteen
thousand dollars. But no person shall be entitled to

SB 956 6
compensation for the burial expenses of a deceased employee
unless he or she has furnished the same by authority of the
widow or widower, the nearest relative of the deceased
employee in the county of his or her death, his or her
personal representative, or the employer, who shall have the
right to give the authority in the order named. All fees
and charges under this section shall be fair and
reasonable[,] and shall be subject to regulation by the
division or the commission [and shall be limited to such as
are fair and reasonable for similar service to persons of a
like standard of living]. The division or the commission
shall also have jurisdiction to hear and determine all
disputes as to the charges. If the deceased employee leaves
no dependents, the death benefit in this subdivision
provided shall be the limit of the liability of the employer
under this chapter on account of the death, except as herein
provided for burial expenses and except as provided in
section 287.140; provided that in all cases when the
employer admits or does not deny liability for the burial
expense, it shall be paid within thirty days after written
notice, that the service has been rendered, has been
delivered to the employer. The notice may be sent by
registered mail, return receipt requested, or may be made by
personal delivery;
(2) The employer shall also pay to the dependents of
the employee a death benefit based on the employee's average
weekly earnings during the year immediately preceding the
injury that results in the death of the employee, as
provided in section 287.250. The amount of compensation for
death, which shall be paid in installments in the same
manner that compensation is required to be paid under this
chapter, shall be computed as follows:

SB 956 7
(a) If the injury which caused the death occurred on
or after September 28, 1983, but before September 28, 1986,
the weekly compensation shall be an amount equal to sixty-
six and two-thirds percent of the employee's average weekly
earnings during the year immediately preceding the injury;
provided that the weekly compensation paid under this
paragraph shall not exceed an amount equal to seventy
percent of the state average weekly wage, as such wage is
determined by the division of employment security, as of the
July first immediately preceding the date of injury;
(b) If the injury which caused the death occurred on
or after September 28, 1986, but before August 28, 1990, the
weekly compensation shall be an amount equal to sixty-six
and two-thirds percent of the employee's average weekly
earnings during the year immediately preceding the injury;
provided that the weekly compensation paid under this
paragraph shall not exceed an amount equal to seventy-five
percent of the state average weekly wage, as such wage is
determined by the division of employment security, as of the
July first immediately preceding the date of injury;
(c) If the injury which caused the death occurred on
or after August 28, 1990, but before August 28, 1991, the
weekly compensation shall be an amount equal to sixty-six
and two-thirds percent of the injured employee's average
weekly earnings as of the date of the injury; provided that
the weekly compensation paid under this paragraph shall not
exceed an amount equal to one hundred percent of the state
average weekly wage;
(d) If the injury which caused the death occurred on
or after August 28, 1991, the weekly compensation shall be
an amount equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the
injured employee's average weekly earnings as of the date of

SB 956 8
the injury; provided that the weekly compensation paid under
this paragraph shall not exceed an amount equal to one
hundred five percent of the state average weekly wage;
(e) If the injury which caused the death occurred on
or after September 28, 1981, the weekly compensation shall
in no event be less than forty dollars per week;
(3) The word "dependent" as used in this chapter shall
mean:
(a) A wife upon a husband with whom she lives or who
is legally liable for her support, and a husband upon a wife
with whom he lives or who is legally liable for his support;
provided that on the death or remarriage of a widow or
widower, the death benefit shall cease unless there be other
dependents entitled to any death benefits under this
chapter. In the event of remarriage, a lump sum payment
equal in amount to the benefits due for a period of two
years shall be paid to the widow or widower. Thereupon the
periodic death benefits shall cease unless there are other
dependents entitled to any death benefit under this chapter,
in which event the periodic benefits to which such widow or
widower would have been entitled had he or she not died or
remarried shall be divided among such other dependents and
paid to them during their period of entitlement under this
chapter; or
(b) A natural, posthumous, or adopted child or
children, whether legitimate or illegitimate, including any
stepchild claimable by the deceased on his or her federal
tax return at the time of injury, under the age of eighteen
100 years, or over that age if physically or mentally
101 incapacitated from wage earning, upon the parent legally
102 liable for the support or with whom he, she, or they are
103 living at the time of the death of the parent. In case

SB 956 9
104 there is a wife or a husband mentally or physically
105 incapacitated from wage earning, dependent upon a wife or
106 husband, and a child or more than one child thus dependent,
107 the death benefit shall be divided among them in such
108 proportion as may be determined by the commission after
109 considering their ages and other facts bearing on the
110 dependency. In all other cases questions of the degree of
111 dependency shall be determined in accordance with the facts
112 at the time of the injury, and in such other cases if there
113 is more than one person wholly dependent the death benefit
114 shall be divided equally among them. The payment of death
115 benefits to a child or other dependent as provided in this
116 paragraph shall cease when the dependent dies, attains the
117 age of eighteen years, or becomes physically and mentally
118 capable of wage earning over that age, or until twenty-two
119 years of age if the child of the deceased is in attendance
120 and remains as a full-time student in any accredited
121 educational institution, or if at eighteen years of age the
122 dependent child is a member of the Armed Forces of the
123 United States on active duty; provided, however, that such
124 dependent child shall be entitled to compensation during
125 four years of full-time attendance at a fully accredited
126 educational institution to commence prior to twenty-three
127 years of age and immediately upon cessation of his or her
128 active duty in the Armed Forces, unless there are other
129 dependents entitled to the death benefit under this chapter;
130 (4) The division or the commission may, in its
131 discretion, order or award the share of compensation of any
132 such child to be paid to the parent, grandparent, or other
133 adult next of kin or conservator of the child for the
134 latter's support, maintenance and education, which order or
135 award upon notice to the parties may be modified from time

SB 956 10
136 to time by the commission in its discretion with respect to
137 the person to whom shall be paid the amount of the order or
138 award remaining unpaid at the time of the modification;
139 (5) The payments of compensation by the employer in
140 accordance with the order or award of the division or the
141 commission shall discharge the employer from all further
142 obligations as to the compensation;
143 (6) All death benefits in this chapter shall be paid
144 in installments in the same manner as provided for
145 disability compensation;
146 (7) Every employer shall keep a record of the correct
147 names and addresses of the dependents of each of his or her
148 employees, and upon the death of an employee by accident
149 arising out of and in the course of his or her employment
150 shall so far as possible immediately furnish the division
151 with such names and addresses;
152 (8) Dependents receiving death benefits under the
153 provisions of this chapter shall annually report to the
154 division as to marital status in the case of a widow or
155 widower or age and physical or mental condition of a
156 dependent child. The division shall provide forms for the
157 making of such reports.
537.610. 1. The commissioner of administration,
through the purchasing division, and the governing body of
each political subdivision of this state, notwithstanding
any other provision of law, may purchase liability insurance
for tort claims, made against the state or the political
subdivision, but the maximum amount of such coverage shall
not exceed [two] four million dollars for all claims arising
out of a single occurrence and shall not exceed [three] five
hundred thousand dollars for any one person in a single
accident or occurrence, except for those claims governed by

SB 956 11
the provisions of the Missouri workers' compensation law,
chapter 287, and no amount in excess of the above limits
shall be awarded or settled upon. Sovereign immunity for
the state of Missouri and its political subdivisions is
waived only to the maximum amount of and only for the
purposes covered by such policy of insurance purchased
pursuant to the provisions of this section and in such
amount and for such purposes provided in any self-insurance
plan duly adopted by the governing body of any political
subdivision of the state.
2. The liability of the state and its public entities
on claims within the scope of sections 537.600 to 537.650,
shall not exceed [two] four million dollars for all claims
arising out of a single accident or occurrence and shall not
exceed [three] five hundred thousand dollars for any one
person in a single accident or occurrence, except for those
claims governed by the provisions of the Missouri workers'
compensation law, chapter 287.
3. No award for damages on any claim against a public
entity within the scope of sections 537.600 to 537.650,
shall include punitive or exemplary damages, provided that
punitive or exemplary damages may be awarded when the
plaintiff shows by clear and convincing evidence that the
public entity violated a safety standard issued by the
employer or the federal occupational safety and health
administration, regulation, or statute in this state, or any
lawful order of a court or other judicial body.
4. If the amount awarded to or settled upon multiple
claimants exceeds [two] four million dollars, any party may
apply to any circuit court to apportion to each claimant his
proper share of the total amount limited by subsection 1 of
this section. The share apportioned each claimant shall be

SB 956 12
in the proportion that the ratio of the award or settlement
made to him bears to the aggregate awards and settlements
for all claims arising out of the accident or occurrence,
but the share shall not exceed [three] five hundred thousand
dollars.
5. The limitation on awards for liability provided for
in this section shall be increased or decreased on an annual
basis effective January first of each year in accordance
with the Implicit Price Deflator for Personal Consumption
Expenditures as published by the Bureau of Economic Analysis
of the United States Department of Commerce. The current
value of the limitation shall be calculated by the director
of the department of commerce and insurance, who shall
furnish that value to the secretary of state, who shall
publish such value in the Missouri Register as soon after
each January first as practicable, but it shall otherwise be
exempt from the provisions of section 536.021.
6. Any claim filed against any public entity under
this section shall be subject to the penalties provided by
supreme court rule 55.03, or any successor rule.
✓